Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.070

Holding court in another county—Reimbursement for expenses.

For attendance while holding court in another county or district pursuant to the direction of the chief justice, a judge shall be entitled to receive from the county to which he or she is sent reimbursement for subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses in accordance with the rates applicable to state officers under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now or hereafter amended.

[ 2011 c 336 s 71; 1981 c 186 s 4; 1957 c 259 s 7.]